Missouri, session 2026, HCR30.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
WHEREAS, the state of Missouri has outstanding natural beauty that Missourians
and visitors enjoy; and

WHEREAS, the rebuilding and improvement of Interstate 70 provides an opportunity
to enhance traffic safety, showcase Missouri's natural beauty, and highlight its cultural,
historical, commercial, and tourist attractions; and

WHEREAS, Interstate 70 through Missouri has on average 2.5 times more billboards
per mile than any other state along the I-70 corridor from Maryland to Utah, contributing to
increased driver distraction and compromising the safety of motorists and passengers; and

WHEREAS, the Missouri outdoor advertising statute permits the removal of trees
and other vegetation, often planted with state tax dollars, to enhance the visibility of outdoor
advertising signs; and

WHEREAS, preserving Missouri's natural scenic beauty and promoting its safety,
tourism, and economic development potential are valid public purposes and should be
considered during the I-70 rebuild; and

WHEREAS, this is a transportation, economic development, and quality-of-life issue,
and input should be sought from stakeholders in roadside commerce; tourism; outdoor

HCR 30 2
advertising; historical, cultural and scenic conservation; and municipal and county
governments; and

WHEREAS, Missourians deserve safe, well-maintained, adequate, and more
beautiful highways that are a source of pride and commerce:

NOW THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that the members of the House of
Representatives of the One Hundred Third General Assembly, Second Regular Session, the
Senate concurring therein, hereby appoint a Commission on Interstate 70 Safety and
Beautification composed of the chair of the House Transportation and Infrastructure
Committee, members of the Missouri Municipal League and the Missouri Association of
Counties, and all members of the Scenic Byways Advisory Committee as described in 7 CSR
10-12.030(3). The purpose of the Commission is to study, discuss, and recommend to the
Department of Transportation and to the General Assembly strategies to enhance the safety
and visual and scenic character of the I-70 corridor through reasonable landscaping, sign
control, and highway, bridge, and lighting design standards; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the Chief Clerk of the Missouri House of
Representatives be instructed to prepare a properly inscribed copy of this resolution for the
director of the Missouri Department of Transportation; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that this resolution be sent to the Governor for his
approval or rejection pursuant to the Missouri Constitution.
✔